Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 107
SHAREHOLDERS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

Law reviews:

For article, "Valuation of Stock in

C

losely Held

C

orporations", see 18 Colo. Law. 1731 (1989).

Section

PART 1 MEETINGS

PART 2 VOTING

PART 3 VOTING TRUSTS AND AGREEMENTS

PART 4 ACTIONS BY SHAREHOLDERS